Washington statutes.
RCW 36.96.910

Savings—1979 ex.s. c 5.

The enactment of this act shall not have the effect of terminating, or in any way modifying, any liability, civil or criminal, which shall already be in existence on September 1, 1979.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 5 s 11.]